District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.19

Trauma care system.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish criteria for the designation of, and shall designate, one or more hospitals within the District of Columbia as specialized trauma care facilities.

(b)

The Mayor may establish criteria for the designation of, and may designate, one or more hospitals within the District of Columbia as specialized care facilities for other types of commonly occurring medical emergencies.

(c)

The Mayor may establish and maintain a database of information regarding trauma and emergency medical care services provided within the District of Columbia. All hospitals, health care facilities, and treatment facilities receiving emergency medical care patients, and all entities providing emergency medical care services, shall provide data to the Mayor as specified in rulemaking promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

(d)

To the extent that trauma and emergency medical care records compiled and maintained by the Mayor, hospitals, other health care facilities, treatment facilities, or emergency medical services providers in connection with the trauma and emergency medical care information system pursuant to this chapter contain patient identifiable data, that data shall be maintained pursuant to applicable privacy laws.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 20, 56 DCR 1167